Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-903
Refusing to aid a peace officer; penalty.

(1) A person commits the offense of refusing to aid a peace officer if, upon request by a person known to him to be a peace officer, he unreasonably refuses or fails to aid such peace officer in:

(a) Apprehending any person charged with or convicted of any offense against any of the laws of this state; or

(b) Securing such offender when apprehended; or

(c) Conveying such offender to the jail of the county.

(2) Refusing to aid a peace officer is a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 188.